Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.070

Issuance of licenses—Scope—Business license application and fees—Action by regulatory agency, when—Agencies provided information.

(1) Any person requiring licenses that have been incorporated into the system must submit a business license application to the department requesting the issuance of the licenses. The business license application form must contain in consolidated form information necessary for the issuance of the licenses.

(2) The applicant must include with the application the sum of all fees and deposits required for the requested individual license endorsements as well as the handling fee established by the department under the authority of RCW 19.02.075.

(3) Irrespective of any authority delegated to the department to implement the provisions of this chapter, the authority for approving issuance and renewal of any requested license that requires a prelicensing or renewal investigation, inspection, testing, or other judgmental review by the regulatory agency otherwise legally authorized to issue the license must remain with that agency. The business licensing service has the authority to issue those licenses for which proper fee payment and a completed application form have been received and for which no prelicensing or renewal approval action is required by the regulatory agency.

(4) Upon receipt of the application and proper fee payment for any license for which issuance is subject to regulatory agency action under subsection (3) of this section, the department must immediately notify the regulatory agency with authority to approve issuance or renewal of the license requested by the applicant. Each regulatory agency must advise the department within a reasonable time after receiving the notice: (a) That the agency approves the issuance of the requested license and will advise the applicant of any specific conditions required for issuing the license; (b) that the agency denies the issuance of the license and gives the applicant reasons for the denial; or (c) that the application is pending.

(5) The department must issue a business license endorsed for all the approved licenses to the applicant and advise the applicant of the status of other requested licenses. It is the responsibility of the applicant to contest the decision regarding conditions imposed or licenses denied through the normal process established by statute or by the regulatory agency with the authority for approving issuance of the license.

(6) Regulatory agencies must be provided information from the business license application for their licensing and regulatory functions.

[ 2013 c 144 s 19; 2011 c 298 s 7; 1990 c 264 s 1; 1982 c 182 s 6; 1979 c 158 s 79; 1977 ex.s. c 319 s 7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Effective date—1990 c 264: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1990. The director of licensing may immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure that sections 1 and 2 of this act are implemented on their effective date." [ 1990 c 264 s 5.]